Utah statutes.
26-8b-402.   AEDs for demonstration purposes.

(1)  Any AED used solely for demonstration or training purposes, which is not operational for emergency use is, except for the provisions of this section, exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  The owner of an AED described in Subsection (1) shall clearly mark on the exterior of the AED that the AED is for demonstration or training use only.



Enacted by Chapter 98, 2013 General Session

